Nebraska, session 109, LB262.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $632,982 from the General
Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $632,982 from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to the
Legislative Council, for Program 1, for the payment of salaries of members of
the Nebraska Legislature and the payments to be made as provided by Chapter 68,
article 6.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $588,000 for FY2025-26 or
$588,000 for FY2026-27.
Sec. 2. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2025.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-